Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.345

Federal funds for management and protection of forests, forest and range lands—Disbursement of funds.

The department is authorized to disburse such funds, together with any funds which may be appropriated or contributed from any source for such purposes, on management and protection of forests and forest and range lands.

[ 2003 c 334 s 203; 1988 c 128 s 14; 1957 c 78 s 2. Formerly RCW 76.01.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.